Utah statutes.
63F-1-104.   Purposes.

The department shall:

(1)  lead state executive branch agency efforts to reengineer the state's information technology architecture with the goal of coordinating central and individual agency information technology in a manner that:

(a)  ensures compliance with the executive branch agency strategic plan; and

(b)  ensures that cost-effective, efficient information and communication systems and resources are being used by agencies to:

(i)  reduce data, hardware, and software redundancy;

(ii)  improve system interoperability and data accessibility between agencies; and

(iii)  meet the agency's and user's business and service needs;

(2)  coordinate an executive branch strategic plan for all agencies;

(3)  each year, in coordination with the governor's office, convene a group of public and private sector information technology and data security experts to identify best practices from agencies and other public and private sector entities, including best practices for data and information technology system security standards;

(4)  develop and implement processes to replicate information technology best practices and standards identified in Subsection (3), throughout the executive branch;

(5)  by July 1, 2015, and at least once every two years thereafter:

(a)  evaluate the adequacy of the department's and the executive branch agencies' data and information technology system security standards through an independent third party assessment; and

(b)  communicate the results of the independent third party assessment to the appropriate executive branch agencies and to the president of the Senate and the speaker of the House of Representatives;

(6)  oversee the expanded use and implementation of project and contract management principles as they relate to information technology projects within the executive branch;

(7)  serve as general contractor between the state's information technology users and private sector providers of information technology products and services;

(8)  work toward building stronger partnering relationships with providers;

(9)  develop service level agreements with executive branch departments and agencies to ensure quality products and services are delivered on schedule and within budget;

(10)  develop standards for application development including a standard methodology and cost-benefit analysis that all agencies shall utilize for application development activities;

(11)  determine and implement statewide efforts to standardize data elements and determine data ownership assignments among executive branch agencies;

(12)  develop systems and methodologies to review, evaluate, and prioritize existing information technology projects within the executive branch and report to the governor and the Public Utilities and Technology Interim Committee on a semiannual basis regarding the status of information technology projects; and

(13)  assist the Governor's Office of Management and Budget with the development of information technology budgets for agencies.



Amended by Chapter 53, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 310, 2013 General Session

